Massachusetts, session 194th, H3622.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7 of Chapter 90, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking out the entire sentence beginning with the word “Every” in line 149 and
ending with the words “or older.” in line 158.
of 1